Rhode Island statutes. Title 6 Commercial Law — General Regulatory Provisions
Chapter 13 Unfair Sales Practices

6-13-1.
Definitions.

“Cost to the retailer” means the invoice cost of the merchandise to the retailer within thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, or the replacement cost of the merchandise to the retailer within thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, in the quantity last purchased, whichever is lower; less all trade discounts except customary discounts for cash; to which shall be added:

Freight charges not otherwise included in the cost of the merchandise;

Cartage to the retail outlet if performed or paid for by the retailer, which cartage cost shall be deemed to be three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) of the cost of the merchandise to the retailer, unless the retailer claims and proves a lower cartage cost; and

A markup to cover in part the cost of doing business, which markup, in the absence of proof of a lesser cost, shall be six percent (6%) of the total cost at the retail outlet.

“Cost to the wholesaler” means the invoice cost of the merchandise to the wholesaler within thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, or the replacement cost of the merchandise to the wholesaler within thirty (30) days prior to the date of the sale, in the quantity last purchased, whichever is lower; less all trade discounts except customary discounts for cash; to which shall be added:

Freight charges not otherwise included in the cost of the merchandise;

Cartage to the retail outlet if performed or paid for by the wholesaler, which cartage cost shall be deemed to be three-fourths of one percent (0.75%) of the cost of the merchandise to the wholesaler, unless the wholesaler claims and proves a lower cartage cost; and

A markup to cover in part the cost of doing business, which markup, in the absence of proof of a lesser cost, shall be two percent (2%) of the total cost at the wholesale establishment.

Where two (2) or more items are advertised; offered for sale; or sold at a combined price; the price of each item shall be determined in the manner stated in subsections (a) and (b).

“Sell at retail”, “sales at retail”, and “retail sale” mean and include any transfer of title to tangible personal property for a valuable consideration made in the ordinary course of trade or in the usual prosecution of the seller’s business to the purchaser for consumption or use other than resale or further processing or manufacturing. In this and in the preceding subsection the previous terms shall include any transfer of property where title is retained by the seller as security for the payment of the purchase price.

“Retailer” means and includes every person, co-partnership, corporation, or association engaged in the business of making sales at retail within this state; provided, that, in the case of a retailer engaged in the business of making sales both at retail and at wholesale, the term shall be applied only to the retail portion of the business.

“Wholesaler” means and includes every person, partnership, corporation, or association engaged in the business of making sales at wholesale within this state; provided, that, in the case of a wholesaler engaged in the business of making sales both at wholesale and at retail, the term shall be applied only to the wholesale portion of the business.

Whenever any person, partnership, corporation, or association in the course of doing business performs the functions of both wholesaler and retailer without actually being engaged in the business of making sales at wholesale, the term “wholesaler” means and includes that function of the business of preparation for sale at the retail outlet, and the term “retailer” shall be applied only to the retail portion of the business.

“Household” means and includes those who dwell under the same roof, house, or apartment.

“Rebate” means a refund of a portion of the purchase price made to consumer to induce purchase of product.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 671, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-1

; P.L. 1985, ch. 150, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 627, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-2.
Computation of cost of tobacco products.

For purposes of this chapter:

The tax imposed by chapter 20 of title 44 shall be deemed to be a part of the original cost of cigarettes to the wholesaler;

The invoice or replacement cost of cigarettes, cigars, smoking tobacco, chewing tobacco, snuff, and other tobacco products, to any wholesaler or retailer, shall be deemed to be the minimum price in this state at which the products may be purchased in this state by the wholesaler or retailer; and

Merchandise given gratis to a wholesaler or to a retailer for display, advertising, or promotion purposes, or otherwise, shall not be considered in determining the cost of merchandise to the wholesaler or retailer, as the case may be.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 663, § 4; P.L. 1941, ch. 1039, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-2

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-2.1.
Sales of milk.

It shall be unlawful for any person, with intent to injure competitors or destroy competition, to sell within the state any milk or render any service in connection with the sale or distribution of milk at a price less than the cost of the milk or services, including, in the case of milk sold, the original purchase price, and in every instance all regular direct or indirect elements of cost, services, physical handling, and financial investment in the milk in question. No milk dealer shall, with this intent, use any method or device, either by discount or rebate; free service; advertising allowance; or by a combination price for the milk together with another commodity or service; that results in the total price of the milk and the other commodity or service being less than the aggregate of the prices for the milk and commodity or service when sold or offered for sale or performed separately or otherwise.

Any person who shall violate the provisions of this section shall upon conviction be subject to the penalty provided in §

6-13-3

. The provisions of §§

6-13-3

—

6-13-8

shall apply to milk in the same manner as if milk were “merchandise”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1962, ch. 75, § 6; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-3.
Penalty for advertising or sale to injure competitors or destroy competition.

Any retailer, who, with intent to injure competitors or destroy competition, advertises, offers to sell, or sells at retail any item of merchandise at less than cost to the retailer, or any wholesaler who, with intent as previously mentioned, advertises, offers to sell, or sells at wholesale any item of merchandise at less than cost to the wholesaler, shall, if the offender is an individual, be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) or by imprisonment for not less than one month nor more than one year, or both; or, if the offender is a corporation, by a fine as previously mentioned. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, as it pertains to a Class A or a Class B distributor of tobacco, any offense of this title shall be punished by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for a first offense; a fine of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and a license suspension of not more than fourteen (14) calendar days for a second offense; and a fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) and a license suspension or revocation for a third offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 671, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-3

; P.L. 2005, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-4.
Below-cost sales as evidence of intent.

Evidence of any advertisement; offer to sell; or sale of any item of merchandise by any retailer or wholesaler at less than cost to him or her, as defined in this chapter, shall be prima facie evidence of intent to injure competitors or destroy competition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 671, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-4

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-5.
Sales exempt from chapter.

This chapter shall not apply with respect to advertising or offering to sell or selling, at retail or at wholesale, as the case may be, if done:

In an isolated transaction and not in the usual course of business;

Where merchandise is sold in bona fide clearance sales, if advertised or offered for sale as such or marked and sold as such, or where merchandise is marked down in an effort to sell the merchandise after bona fide efforts to sell the merchandise prior to the markdown;

Where perishable merchandise must be sold promptly in order to forestall loss;

Where merchandise is imperfect or damaged or its sale is being discontinued, if advertised or offered for sale as such or marked and sold as such;

Where merchandise is advertised or offered for sale or sold upon the final liquidation of any business;

Where merchandise is advertised or offered for sale or sold for charitable purposes or to relief agencies;

Where merchandise is sold on contract to any department, board, or commission of this state, or of any of its political subdivisions, or to any institution maintained thereby; or

Where merchandise is advertised or offered for sale or sold by any fiduciary or other officer acting under the order or direction of any court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 671, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-5

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-6.
Enforcement of chapter.

Upon the complaint of any person, the superior court shall have jurisdiction to restrain and enjoin any act forbidden or declared illegal by any provisions of this chapter and it shall be the duty of the attorney general of this state to enforce and restrain the violation of the sections of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 671, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-6

; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-7.
Conflict with other law.

Whenever the application of any provisions of any other law of this state conflicts with the application of any provision of this chapter then this chapter shall prevail.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 671, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-7

.

6-13-8.
Severability.

If any of the provisions of this chapter, or the application of any provision to any person or circumstance, shall be held invalid, the remainder of this chapter, or the application of the provisions to persons or circumstances other than those to which it is held invalid, shall not be affected thereby.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 671, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

6-13-8

.

6-13-9.
Retail sales of electrical appliances.

Any person who shall sell any electrical appliance at retail at a price in excess of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall conspicuously note on any bill of sale any model year designated by the manufacturer of the electrical appliance.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 180, § 1.

6-13-10.
Unsolicited goods.

The receipt of unsolicited goods, wares, or merchandise through the mail or otherwise shall for all purposes be deemed an unconditional gift to the recipient who may use or dispose of the unsolicited goods, wares, or merchandise in any manner he or she sees fit without any obligation on his or her part to the sender.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 193, § 1.

6-13-11.
Discount price advertisement.

It shall be unlawful to use, communicate, or publish any advertisement that states that an item or product is being sold or offered for sale at below the regular price or at a percentage off the regular price without posting the regular price at the point of purchase. Whenever an item or product is advertised for sale at below the regular price or at a percentage off the regular price, the advertisement shall clearly state whether there is an additional charge for equipment or services that are reasonably necessary for the proper use of the product. Any person, firm, or corporation who or that shall violate the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 87, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 212, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-12.
Sales of gift certificates.

“Gift certificate” means a record evidencing a promise, made for monetary consideration, by the seller or issuer for the record that goods or services will be provided to the owner of the record to the value shown in the record and includes, but is not limited to: (1) A record that contains a microprocessor chip, magnetic strip, or other means of storage of information that is pre-funded and for which the value is decremented upon each use; (2) A gift card, an electronic gift card, stored-value card or certificate; (3) A store card; (4) Prepaid long-distance telephone service that is activated by a prepaid card that requires dialing an access number or an access code for each call in addition to dialing the phone number to which the user of the prepaid card seeks to connect; or (5) A similar record or card. Any person, firm, or corporation that sells gift certificates for any product or merchandise sold by the person, firm, or corporation, shall be required to record the sales and keep an accurate and complete record of each gift certificate sold. The record shall include the date of sale; the full value of the certificate; the identification number assigned by the retailer to the certificate; and the state in which the sale of the certificate took place. The retailer shall further be required to give to the purchaser of gift certificates exceeding fifty dollars ($50.00) a written and numbered receipt evidencing the sale of the certificate. It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation of any kind to charge any surcharge or additional monthly or annual service or maintenance fees on gift certificates or to limit the time for the redemption of a gift certificate or to place an expiration date upon the gift certificate. No gift certificate or any agreement with respect to such gift certificate may contain language suggesting that an expiration date may apply to the gift certificate. Any person, firm, or corporation that shall violate the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200). Due to the unlimited redemption period, the division of taxation shall not escheat the funds paid for those unredeemed gift certificates. Any unused portion of a redeemed gift certificate shall be afforded to the consumer by reissuing the gift certificate for the unused amount or providing cash where the balance due the consumer is less than one dollar ($1.00). This section shall not apply to the following:

Gift certificates that are distributed to a consumer pursuant to an awards, loyalty, or promotional program without any money or other thing of value being given in exchange for the gift certificate by the consumer. Any restrictions or limitations that such gift certificates may be subject to must be disclosed to the consumer, in writing, at the time the gift certificates are distributed to the consumer.

Prepaid wireless telephone service or prepaid wireless telephone card. “Prepaid wireless telephone service” means wireless telephone service that is activated in advance by payment for a finite dollar amount of service or for a finite set of minutes that terminate either upon use by a customer and delivery by the wireless provider of an agreed-upon amount of service corresponding to the total dollar amount paid in advance or within a certain period of time following the initial purchase or activation, unless additional payments are made.

Gift cards or prepaid or store value cards that are issued by state-chartered financial institutions and credit unions or that are issued by third-party issuers usable at multiple, unaffiliated merchants or service providers; provided that said financial institutions, credit unions, or third-party issuers comply with the guidelines on disclosure and marketing as published by the office of the comptroller of the currency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 54, § 1; P.L. 1986, ch. 239, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 148, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 221, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 541, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 548, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 604, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 378, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 439, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 251, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-12.1.
Donation of gift certificates.

Any gift certificate/card as defined in §

6-13-12

that has been donated for fundraising purposes shall be exempt from the provisions of §

6-13-12

relating to expiration dates, provided, that the gift certificate/card clearly states that the gift certificate/card has been donated for charity purposes and is subject to a clearly defined expiration date not less than one year from the issuance of the gift certificate/card to the gift certificate/card recipient.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 281, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-13.
Cash register windows — Obstruction of view.

It shall be unlawful to intentionally obstruct the view of any price being registered by a cash register or similar device, or the total cost of purchases, during a sale at retail of any goods or merchandise if the price is not visible to the consumer in another display on the same register or device. Any person, firm, or corporation in violation of the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25.00). For the purpose of this section, an obstruction to the view of any price shall not be prima facie evidence of intent.

History of Section.

P.L. 1981, ch. 29, § 1.

6-13-14.
Automatic lease renewal — Notice required.

For purposes of this section, “automatic lease renewal” means a provision in a written lease of personal property providing that, unless the lessee gives written notice to the contrary, the lease shall be automatically renewed for an additional term at the end of the initial lease term or at the end of any subsequent lease term.

Subject to the exclusions stated in subsection (d) of this section, every lessor of personal property under a written lease containing an automatic lease renewal shall give written notice to the lessee not more than ninety (90) nor less than forty-five (45) days prior to the expiration of the lease term. The notice shall state the date upon which the lease term will expire and shall advise the lessee that the lease will be automatically renewed unless the lessee gives written notice to the contrary.

In the event that the lessor fails to give notice as required by subsection (b) of this section, the automatic lease renewal shall be voidable at the option of the lessee.

This section shall not apply to any lease having a term of less than one year. This section shall not apply to any lease wherein the fair market value of the property being leased exceeds one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) on the date the lease is executed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 480, § 1.

6-13-15.
Prohibition against recording credit card or social security numbers on checks.

It shall be unlawful, during a sale at retail of any goods or merchandise, to record any credit card or all or part of a social security number obtained from a purchaser as a means of identification upon the check of the purchaser tendered for the sale. Any person, firm, or corporation that shall violate the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100). This section does not prohibit any person from requesting production of, or recording, a credit card number as a condition for cashing or accepting a check, provided the person has agreed with the credit card issuer to cash or accept checks from card holders of the issuer; the issuer has agreed to guarantee card holder checks cashed or accepted by that person; and the card holder has given actual, apparent, or implied authority for the use of his or her card number in the manner and for the purpose described in this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-16.
Prohibition against recording personal information in credit card transactions.

No person, firm, partnership, or corporation that accepts credit cards for the transaction of business shall require the credit card holder to write or cause to be written on a transaction form any personal identification information, including, but not limited to, the credit card holder’s address or telephone number, that is not required by the credit card issuer to complete the credit card transactions.

The credit card holder’s address and telephone number may be required on a transaction form where: (1) this information is necessary for shipping, delivery, installation of purchased merchandise, consumer rental transactions, warranty, or for special orders; (2) authorization from the credit card issuer as to the availability of credit is required by the issuer to complete the credit card transaction; or (3) the person, firm, partnership, or corporation processes credit card transactions by mailing transaction forms to the designated bankcard center for settlement.

This section shall not preclude a person, firm, partnership, or corporation that accepts credit cards from requesting this personal identification and recording it, if it is provided by the card holder pursuant to that request.

Any person, firm, partnership, or corporation who or that shall violate the provisions of this section shall be punished by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 351, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-17.
Requiring consumers to furnish social security numbers.

Unless otherwise required by federal law, no person shall require that a consumer of goods or services disclose all or part of a social security number incident to the sale of consumer goods or services; provided, however, that:

Insurance companies and institutions licensed by the state or federal government for financial services may require applicants for those services to disclose their social security number;

Social security numbers may be required for the providing and billing of health care or pharmaceutical-related services, including the issuance of identification cards and account numbers for users of health care or pharmaceutical-related services; and

Disclosure may be required of a consumer as a condition of applying for a credit card for the purchase of goods or services.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction, shall be fined not more than five hundred dollars ($500).

In any civil action alleging a violation of this section, the court may award damages, reasonable attorney’s fees, and costs to a prevailing consumer and afford injunctive relief against any person or business that commits or proposes to commit a violation of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 435, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-18.
Check cashing discrimination.

A business that willingly accepts personal checks from Rhode Island customers for goods or services shall be prohibited from refusing checks based solely on the geographic area in which the customer lives within the state of Rhode Island. Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be punished by a civil penalty of not more than one hundred dollars ($100) per violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 196, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-19.
Requiring consumers to furnish social security numbers.

No person, firm, corporation, or other business entity that offers discount cards for purchases made at any business maintained by the offeror shall require that a consumer of goods who applies for a discount card furnish all or part of his or her social security number as a condition precedent to the application for the consumer discount card. No information obtained on the application or by use of a discount card can be sold or given to any other person, firm, corporation, or business entity, provided that the person, firm, corporation, or other business may: (a) disclose such information to its affiliates, to service providers that perform services for it, or as required by law; and/or (b) transfer such information in connection with the sale of its business operations.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2005, ch. 408, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 57, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-20.
Rebate restrictions — prohibited.

No person, firm, business, partnership or corporation that issues rebates to its customers in the course of their transactions of business shall restrict their use to one per household per item purchased; provided, however, that this section shall not apply to rebates on the sale of beverages.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 627, § 2; P.L. 2007, ch. 138, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 270, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.

6-13-21.
Price gouging — Essential commodities.

Upon a declaration of a state of emergency by the governor, or federal disaster declaration by the president, it shall be an unfair sales practice for individuals or retailers to participate in price gouging by making sales, or offering to sell, within the area for which the market emergency is declared, essential commodities to consumers for an amount that represents an unconscionably high price.

As used in this section:

“Unconscionably high price” means the amount charged represents a gross disparity between the average prices at which the same or similar commodity was readily available and sold or offered for sale within the local trade area in the usual course of business during the thirty (30) days immediately before the declaration of the market emergency and the additional charges are not substantially attributable to increased cost to retailers, imposed by their suppliers, including replacement costs imposed by the vendors’ source. Additionally, the average price calculation during said thirty-day (30) period shall not include discounted prices set and offered as a result of bona fide manufacturer’s or supplier’s limited discounts or rebates.

(i) Under a federal disaster declaration by the president or upon a declaration of a state of emergency by the governor, it is unlawful and a violation of chapter 13 of title 6, and §

30-15-9(e)(12)

, to sell, or offer to sell, at an unconscionably high price, any essential commodity.

(2)

“Price gouging” means charging a consumer an unconscionably high price for essential commodities during a declared market emergency.

(3)

“Essential commodities” means any goods, services, materials, merchandise, supplies, equipment, resources, or other article of commerce, and includes, without limitation, home heating fuels, motor fuels, food, water, ice, chemicals, petroleum products, and lumber necessary for consumption or use as a direct result of the market emergency.

(4)

“Market emergency” means any declaration of a state of emergency by the governor or federal disaster declaration by the president. The market emergency shall exist until the declaration expires or is terminated.

(5)

“Individual” means a person, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.

(6)

“Consumer” means an individual who enters into a transaction primarily for personal, family, or household purposes.

(7)

“Retailer” means and includes every individual licensed to engage in the business of making sales at retail within this state.

(c)

This section shall not prohibit the fluctuation in price of essential commodities that occur during the normal course of business.

(d)

Any violation of this section shall constitute an unfair sales practice under the terms of chapter 13.1 of this title.

(e)

In addition to the penalties provided in chapter 13.1 of this title, and subdivision

30-15-9(e)(12)

, the court may impose orders and civil penalties, including, but not limited to:

A fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) per violation with an aggregate total not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) for any twenty-four-hour (24) period;

An order to pay costs of litigation relating to the offense;

An order for disgorgement of profits earned; and

Any other relief determined by the court to be appropriate.

(f)

All monetary penalties so collected shall accrue to the enforcing authority to further consumer enforcement efforts.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 311, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 333, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 528, § 9.